Oklahoma, session 2026, SB826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.417 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:



Req. No. 310 Page 1


1. “Individuals who have a chronic illness or physical


disability” means individuals whose primary diagnosis is a severe


physical condition that may require ongoing medical or surgical


intervention;


2. “Low-income residents” means persons whose household income


is less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty


level;


3. “Qualified individual” means any of the following:


a. a foster child in the foster care program of the


Department of Human Services or a federally recognized


Indian tribe with whom the Department has a contract,


b. a person who is participating in a program established


pursuant to the Successful Adulthood Act, Section 1-9-


107 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


c. a person who is twenty-six (26) years of age or less,


and whose reason for leaving the foster care program


of the Department of Human Services or a federally


recognized Indian tribe with whom the Department has a


contract is any of the following:


(1) reaching adulthood,


(2) adoption or legal guardianship after reaching


fifteen (15) years of age, or


(3) reunification with biological parents after


reaching fourteen (14) years of age;

Req. No. 310 Page 2


4. “Qualifying charitable organization” means a charitable


organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) or is a designated community action


agency that receives community services block grant program monies


pursuant to 42 U.S.C., Section 9901. The organization shall spend


at least fifty percent (50%) of its budget on services to residents


of this state who receive benefits from the Temporary Assistance for


Needy Families Program to low-income residents of this state and


their households or to individuals who have a chronic illness or


physical disability and who are residents of this state. Taxpayers


choosing to make donations through an umbrella charitable


organization that collects donations on behalf of member charities


shall designate that the donation be directed to a member charitable


organization that would qualify under this section on a stand-alone


basis. Qualifying charitable organization shall not include any


entity that provides, pays for, or provides coverage of abortions or


that financially supports any other entity that provides, pays for,


or provides coverage of abortions;


5. “Qualifying foster care charitable organization” means an


organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3) or is a designated community action


agency that receives community services block grant program monies


pursuant to 42 U.S.C., Section 9901, and that each operating year


provides services to at least two hundred (200) qualified

Req. No. 310 Page 3


individuals in this state and spends at least fifty percent (50%) of


its budget on services to qualified individuals in this state; and


6. “Services” means:


a. for a qualifying charitable organization, cash


assistance, medical care, child care, food, clothing,


shelter, job placement, and job training services or


any other assistance that is reasonably necessary to


meet immediate basic needs and that is provided and


used in this state, and


b. for a qualifying foster care charitable organization,


cash assistance, medical care, behavioral health


services, child care, food, including snacks at the


qualifying foster care charitable organization’s


foster youth events, clothing, shelter, job placement


services, job training services, character education


programs, workforce development programs, secondary


education student retention programs, housing or


financial literacy services or any other assistance


that is reasonably necessary to meet basic needs or


provide normalcy and that is provided and used in this


state. For the purposes of this subparagraph,


“normalcy” means the condition of experiencing a


typical childhood by participating in activities that



Req. No. 310 Page 4


are age or developmentally-appropriate, as the term is


defined in 42 U.S.C., Section 675.


B. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, an amount equal to


contributions by a taxpayer to a qualifying charitable organization,


other than contributions to a qualifying foster care charitable


organization, not to exceed:


1. Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) for those filing as single,


head of household, or married filing separately; and


2. Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00) for those married filing


jointly.


C. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to Section 2355


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, an amount equal to


contributions by a taxpayer to a qualifying foster care charitable


organization, not to exceed:


1. Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for those filing as single,


head of household, or married filing separately; and


2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for those married filing


jointly.


D. The credit authorized pursuant to the provisions of


subsections B and C of this section shall not be used to reduce the


income tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).

Req. No. 310 Page 5


E. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to subsections


B and C of this section exceeds the income tax liability, the amount


of credit not used in any tax year may be carried forward, in order,


to each of the five (5) subsequent tax years.


F. The credit authorized by this section shall not be claimed


if the taxpayer claims a deduction allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C.,


Section 170, for the contributions to a qualifying charitable


organization or to a qualifying foster care charitable organization.


G. Taxpayers claiming credit authorized by this section shall


provide the name of the qualifying charitable organization or the


qualifying foster care charitable organization and the amount of the


contribution on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission.


H. A qualifying charitable organization or a qualifying foster


care charitable organization shall provide the Tax Commission a


written certification that it meets all criteria to be considered a


qualifying charitable organization or a qualifying foster care


charitable organization. The organization shall also notify the Tax


Commission of any changes that may affect the qualifications under


this section. The written certification of the organization shall


be signed by an officer of the organization under penalty of


perjury. The written certification shall include the following:


1. Verification of the status of the organization pursuant to


U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), or verification that the organization


is a designated community action agency that receives community

Req. No. 310 Page 6


services block grant program monies pursuant to 42 U.S.C., Section


9901;


2. Financial data indicating the budget of the organization for


the prior tax year and the amount of that budget spent on services


to residents of this state who either:


a. receive benefits from the Temporary Assistance for


Needy Families Program,


b. are low-income residents, or


c. are individuals who have a chronic illness or physical


disability;


3. A statement that the organization plans to continue spending


at least fifty percent (50%) of the budget of the organization on


services to residents of this state who receive benefits from the


Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program, who are low-income


residents or who are individuals who have a chronic illness or


physical disability; and


4. A statement that the organization does not provide, pay for


or provide coverage of abortions and does not financially support


any other entity that provides, pays for or provides coverage of


abortions.


I. The Tax Commission shall review each written certification,


determine whether the organization meets all the criteria to be


considered a qualifying charitable organization or a qualifying


foster care charitable organization, and notify the organization of

Req. No. 310 Page 7


its determination. The Tax Commission may also periodically request


recertification from the organization. The Department shall compile


and make available to the public a list of the qualifying charitable


organizations and qualifying foster care charitable organizations.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-310 QD 1/19/2025 5:44:11 AM



































Req. No. 310 Page 8